Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5402
Legislative findings and declaration.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Population and economic growth in Nebraska has for many years been greater in counties with relatively large populations and economies than in most of Nebraska's less populated counties; and

(2) It is the policy of the state to make revisions in Nebraska's tax structure to encourage employment and business investment that will significantly and positively impact the economies of the state's small-sized and mid-sized counties.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 2.